Washington statutes.
RCW 15.83.005

Intent.

Agricultural products are produced by many individual farmers and ranchers located throughout the state. The efficient production and marketing of agricultural products by farmers, ranchers, and handlers is of vital concern to the welfare and general economy of the state. It is the purpose of this chapter to establish standards of fair practices required of handlers, producers, and associations of producers, with respect to certain agricultural commodities, to establish the mutual obligation of handlers and accredited associations of producers to negotiate relative to the production or marketing of these agricultural commodities.

It is the intent of the legislature that a workable process be developed through which a fair price and other contract terms can be arrived at through negotiations between processors of agricultural products and an accredited association of producers, and that in developing rules and administering this chapter the director of agriculture shall recognize this intent.

[ 1989 c 355 s 1.]